Utah statutes.
58-60-503.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Substance Use Disorder Counselor Licensing Board consisting of:

(a)  three substance use disorder counselors;

(b)  three mental health therapists qualified by education or experience to treat substance use disorder and who are currently practicing in the substance use disorder field; and

(c)  one public member.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in the investigation of a complaint may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2012 General Session

